lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY ්ාෘුැූෑිීෙ

REP 25
REP න ණ
REP ණ න
REP ල ළ
REP ළ ල
REP ස ෂ
REP ෂ ස
REP ස ශ
REP ශ ස
REP ච ඡ
REP ඡ ච
REP බ භ
REP භ බ
REP ද ධ
REP ධ ද
REP ර් ්‍ර
REP ට ඨ
REP ඨ ට
REP ක ඛ
REP ඛ ක
REP ඩ ඪ
REP ඪ ඩ
REP ඉ ඊ
REP ඊ ඉ
REP ප ඵ
REP ඵ ප

FLAG num
SFX 2116 Y 1
SFX 2116 0 දමා .
SFX 3959 Y 1
SFX 3959 0 දමේ .
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 භාවය .
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 යින්ට .
SFX 2585 Y 1
SFX 2585 0 යින්ද .
SFX 3128 Y 1
SFX 3128 0 ියාටත් .
SFX 3538 Y 1
SFX 3538 0 වරණයට .
SFX 3863 Y 1
SFX 3863 0 න්නාක් .
SFX 3386 Y 1
SFX 3386 0 සෙට් .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 ණියක් .
SFX 4018 Y 1
SFX 4018 0 ණියකි .
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 0 ාරය .
SFX 1075 Y 1
SFX 1075 0 යොත් .
SFX 2503 Y 1
SFX 2503 0 වරණයේ .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 ාගාරයකට .
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 0 වීම .
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 0 වීය .
SFX 2373 Y 1
SFX 2373 0 ාර් .
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 0 වීර .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 ාරි .
SFX 3267 Y 1
SFX 3267 0 ාරු .
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 0 ිකයන්ගේ .
SFX 1313 Y 1
SFX 1313 0 ුවොත් .
SFX 1177 Y 1
SFX 1177 0 ාගාරයක් .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 ාගෙන් .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 බිම .
SFX 1036 Y 1
SFX 1036 0 ාන්තය .
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 0 ාන්තර .
SFX 2608 Y 1
SFX 2608 0 මාල් .
SFX 2609 Y 1
SFX 2609 0 මාලා .
SFX 4980 Y 1
SFX 4980 0 ීක .
SFX 2714 Y 1
SFX 2714 0 දීමත් .
SFX 2292 Y 1
SFX 2292 0 ීට .
SFX 3098 Y 1
SFX 3098 0 ීත .
SFX 649 Y 1
SFX 649 0 ේදැයි .
SFX 1838 Y 1
SFX 1838 0 ීන .
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 0 ීම .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 ීය .
SFX 4921 Y 1
SFX 4921 0 ීර .
SFX 897 Y 1
SFX 897 0 කාරයන් .
SFX 1252 Y 1
SFX 1252 0 ත්වයත් .
SFX 4062 Y 1
SFX 4062 0 ගොව්වා .
SFX 2392 Y 1
SFX 2392 0 ාගාරවලින් .
SFX 1943 Y 1
SFX 1943 0 ශාලා .
SFX 902 Y 1
SFX 902 0 කත් .
SFX 1150 Y 1
SFX 1150 0 ීව .
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 0 කතා .
SFX 3409 Y 1
SFX 3409 0 සහගත .
SFX 4489 Y 1
SFX 4489 0 ්තුවා .
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 0 යෙක .
SFX 1926 Y 1
SFX 1926 0 ස්ථානයක .
SFX 1366 Y 1
SFX 1366 0 ස්ථානයට .
SFX 3687 Y 1
SFX 3687 0 යෙම .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 ්සන් .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 ගණන් .
SFX 4322 Y 1
SFX 4322 0 ්‍රයක් .
SFX 1365 Y 1
SFX 1365 0 ස්ථානයේ .
SFX 1401 Y 1
SFX 1401 0 මකදී .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 යදැයි .
SFX 4303 Y 1
SFX 4303 0 ්‍රිය .
SFX 4006 Y 1
SFX 4006 0 තමින් .
SFX 4174 Y 1
SFX 4174 0 ංගල .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 දෙන්නේ .
SFX 2482 Y 1
SFX 2482 0 වැන්නා .
SFX 3832 Y 1
SFX 3832 0 පහන් .
SFX 2797 Y 1
SFX 2797 0 ක්වන .
SFX 3224 Y 1
SFX 3224 0 ැලීමට .
SFX 2652 Y 1
SFX 2652 0 න්වන .
SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 0 න්වල .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 ගැනීම .
SFX 4335 Y 1
SFX 4335 0 ්‍යාධාර .
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 0 න්වේ .
SFX 2804 Y 1
SFX 2804 0 කෙරෙන .
SFX 4908 Y 1
SFX 4908 0 ුකාරයා .
SFX 1110 Y 1
SFX 1110 0 ගාරය .
SFX 3923 Y 1
SFX 3923 0 දෙයි .
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 0 කන්ද .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 0 කන්න .
SFX 2689 Y 1
SFX 2689 0 නන්ට .
SFX 559 Y 1
SFX 559 0 නන්ද .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 පතිවරුන් .
SFX 2433 Y 1
SFX 2433 0 සාධක .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 ්තැන් .
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 0 ෝරුව .
SFX 1123 Y 1
SFX 1123 0 ්වෙයි .
SFX 1023 Y 1
SFX 1023 0 ියාට .
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 0 ියාද .
SFX 1851 Y 1
SFX 1851 0 ියාය .
SFX 3299 Y 1
SFX 3299 0 ාධිකාරි .
SFX 3298 Y 1
SFX 3298 0 ාධිකාරී .
SFX 772 Y 1
SFX 772 0 ියාව .
SFX 3362 Y 1
SFX 3362 0 හන් .
SFX 2603 Y 1
SFX 2603 0 ම්ද .
SFX 4901 Y 1
SFX 4901 0 ුටු .
SFX 876 Y 1
SFX 876 0 මල් .
SFX 4490 Y 1
SFX 4490 0 ්තුමා .
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 0 වූවක් .
SFX 3454 Y 1
SFX 3454 0 වූවකි .
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 0 ොන්නරුව .
SFX 4109 Y 1
SFX 4109 0 කීර්ති .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 හැකි .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 දාට .
SFX 1693 Y 1
SFX 1693 0 දාන .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 දාය .
SFX 3944 Y 1
SFX 3944 0 දාව .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 0 දාස .
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 ගැනීමට .
SFX 3499 Y 1
SFX 3499 0 වාලන .
SFX 1024 Y 1
SFX 1024 0 ියාගේ .
SFX 1928 Y 1
SFX 1928 0 සෙන් .
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 0 ගැනීම් .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 ගැනීමේ .
SFX 3497 Y 1
SFX 3497 0 වාලු .
SFX 3709 Y 1
SFX 3709 0 යයෙන් .
SFX 3447 Y 1
SFX 3447 0 වෙහෙර .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 වෝද .
SFX 2451 Y 1
SFX 2451 0 වෝය .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 ියන්ගේ .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 0 ්‍යයකට .
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 0 ්වීමෙන් .
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 0 ීමකදී .
SFX 1451 Y 1
SFX 1451 0 කාරීන් .
SFX 907 Y 1
SFX 907 0 ්නේද .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 ්‍යයක් .
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 0 ්‍යයකි .
SFX 825 Y 1
SFX 825 0 ්නේය .
SFX 1471 Y 1
SFX 1471 0 ්වයෙන් .
SFX 3628 Y 1
SFX 3628 0 රෙකු .
SFX 3546 Y 1
SFX 3546 0 වමයි .
SFX 3571 Y 1
SFX 3571 0 වකදි .
SFX 868 Y 1
SFX 868 0 වකදී .
SFX 4593 Y 1
SFX 4593 0 ෝග .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 0 ෝද .
SFX 2958 Y 1
SFX 2958 0 ෝන .
SFX 2225 Y 1
SFX 2225 0 ෝම .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 ෝය .
SFX 3771 Y 1
SFX 3771 0 මාද .
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 0 මාන .
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 0 ෝව .
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 0 යකටම .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 යකටය .
SFX 4873 Y 1
SFX 4873 0 ුදුව .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 දෙනකු .
SFX 2868 Y 1
SFX 2868 0 ්වනවා .
SFX 1600 Y 1
SFX 1600 0 වාදියකු .
SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 0 ිත්වයේ .
SFX 1276 Y 1
SFX 1276 0 කයාට .
SFX 2005 Y 1
SFX 2005 0 රුවන් .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 ණියක .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 0 ණියට .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 ෙන්නන් .
SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 0 පත්වල .
SFX 4370 Y 1
SFX 4370 0 ්යක් .
SFX 3931 Y 1
SFX 3931 0 දුම .
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 0 දුර .
SFX 1020 Y 1
SFX 1020 0 ිවීම .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 0 නයක .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 නයට .
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 0 දුව .
SFX 4040 Y 1
SFX 4040 0 ටපත් .
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 0 නයි .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 නයේ .
SFX 3699 Y 1
SFX 3699 0 යාවන්ට .
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 0 ුණික .
SFX 3729 Y 1
SFX 3729 0 යටපත් .
SFX 3701 Y 1
SFX 3701 0 යායි .
SFX 2269 Y 1
SFX 2269 0 ුරක් .
SFX 2766 Y 1
SFX 2766 0 ටුවක් .
SFX 1324 Y 1
SFX 1324 0 ුනට .
SFX 1323 Y 1
SFX 1323 0 ුනද .
SFX 4585 Y 1
SFX 4585 0 ෝත්තර .
SFX 1364 Y 1
SFX 1364 0 හරි .
SFX 4995 Y 1
SFX 4995 0 ිසුරු .
SFX 4870 Y 1
SFX 4870 0 ුනහ .
SFX 4151 Y 1
SFX 4151 0 කයින්ගෙන් .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 ුන් .
SFX 1015 Y 1
SFX 1015 0 ුනා .
SFX 3641 Y 1
SFX 3641 0 රීමෙන් .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 ුනි .
SFX 587 Y 1
SFX 587 0 ුනු .
SFX 3749 Y 1
SFX 3749 0 මුර .
SFX 3748 Y 1
SFX 3748 0 මුල .
SFX 1827 Y 1
SFX 1827 0 ුනෙ .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 ුනේ .
SFX 2102 Y 1
SFX 2102 0 ධිපති .
SFX 3300 Y 1
SFX 3300 0 ාධිකරණයට .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 ්නෙමි .
SFX 1291 Y 1
SFX 1291 0 ්නෙමු .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 0 ණිය .
SFX 2049 Y 1
SFX 2049 0 මහල් .
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 0 රක් .
SFX 3682 Y 1
SFX 3682 0 රකි .
SFX 4671 Y 1
SFX 4671 0 ෙසින් .
SFX 2841 Y 1
SFX 2841 0 එළිය .
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 0 ්ෂක .
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 0 තම් .
SFX 4206 Y 1
SFX 4206 0 ්ෂණ .
SFX 2327 Y 1
SFX 2327 0 ිතයන් .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 දෙන .
SFX 4200 Y 1
SFX 4200 0 ්ෂා .
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 යෙක් .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 යෙකි .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 යෙකු .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 ගිරියේ .
SFX 2726 Y 1
SFX 2726 0 ත්මකව .
SFX 2830 Y 1
SFX 2830 0 කලක් .
SFX 3035 Y 1
SFX 3035 0 ුවෙක් .
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 0 ුවෙකි .
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 0 ුවෙකු .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 0 ෝන් .
SFX 4582 Y 1
SFX 4582 0 ෝනා .
SFX 1960 Y 1
SFX 1960 0 වැටි .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 වැටී .
SFX 2358 Y 1
SFX 2358 0 ැදි .
SFX 3233 Y 1
SFX 3233 0 ැදී .
SFX 2448 Y 1
SFX 2448 0 ශයේ .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 වන්නන් .
SFX 1409 Y 1
SFX 1409 0 පත්ව .
SFX 1367 Y 1
SFX 1367 0 සත් .
SFX 4851 Y 1
SFX 4851 0 ුබඩ .
SFX 4850 Y 1
SFX 4850 0 ුබව .
SFX 2547 Y 1
SFX 2547 0 ලාභය .
SFX 3326 Y 1
SFX 3326 0 ාංශයක් .
SFX 2183 Y 1
SFX 2183 0 ්වන්න .
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 0 ඳුන් .
SFX 1507 Y 1
SFX 1507 0 ුස් .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 කරණයෙන් .
SFX 1626 Y 1
SFX 1626 0 ලාභී .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 0 ගමුව .
SFX 2840 Y 1
SFX 2840 0 කටවත් .
SFX 4185 Y 1
SFX 4185 0 ්සිට .
SFX 3160 Y 1
SFX 3160 0 ිදාට .
SFX 2847 Y 1
SFX 2847 0 ්සිය .
SFX 2812 Y 1
SFX 2812 0 කිරීමත් .
SFX 3997 Y 1
SFX 3997 0 තලය .
SFX 4363 Y 1
SFX 4363 0 ්යට .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 ත්ත .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 ්මන් .
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 0 ත්ම .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 0 ත්ය .
SFX 2192 Y 1
SFX 2192 0 ්යය .
SFX 1709 Y 1
SFX 1709 0 තලා .
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 0 ලවල .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 ත්ව .
SFX 3824 Y 1
SFX 3824 0 පිටි .
SFX 2190 Y 1
SFX 2190 0 ්යා .
SFX 4323 Y 1
SFX 4323 0 ්යේ .
SFX 1529 Y 1
SFX 1529 0 ියොත් .
SFX 3895 Y 1
SFX 3895 0 නායකවරයා .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 0 ගෙන්ද .
SFX 4065 Y 1
SFX 4065 0 ගෙන්ම .
