lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අමරව/4921
දක්ෂ/2,8,11,27,74,76,81,92,97,137,161,164,195,202,259,316,470,562,808,890,1838
දිය/1,3,6,7,32,86,87,112,145,160,181,212,346,397,549,551,672,1092,1229,1386,1407,1594,1726,1792,2003,2040,2740,2741,2752,2842,3267,3486,3487,3803,3944
දුම/3,4,5,7,12,18,214,376,1290,2947,3271,4242,4392,4553
දෙය/1,4,6,11,16,17,18,22,23,28,32,73,85,116,127,228,290,339,519,537,592,1040,1861,2373,2397,2399,4539
නැග/3,16,24,42,47,51,56,59,80,83,102,113,121,125,126,140,147,203,209,211,220,230,241,262,263,272,310,316,326,362,374,402,545,587,662,705,748,913,926,1085,1314,1477,1501,1799,1802,2222,2254,2282,2302,2755,4542,4705,4937
පර්යේෂණ/2,12,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,48,62,66,70,97,141,185,281,591,629,1176,1177,1904,1905,2380,2392,2394
පැවත/5,16,51,80,102,113,121,179,203,208,211,216,220,264,280,301,310,316,326,374,472,495,543,622,656,1015,1284,1287,1323,1821,1825,1828,2280,2313,3071,3128,3630,4718
පිස/3,63,102,140,241,276,342,841,931,1027,2116,2168,2220,4182,4183,4184
පුද්ගල/27,47,62,74,81,92,97,128,136,141,146,164,170,195,200,322,328,335,356,369,501,557,589,731,733,795,846,936,1075,1077,1217,1218,1222,1396,1652,1840,2021,2024,2038,2583,2585,2630,3194,3689,3733,3794
පුහුණු/36,37,45,64,130,166,236,260,268,330,344,371,458,599,899,1985,4146
පොලී/897
පෞද්ගල/4980
ප්‍රදර්ශන/2,13,15,19,21,26,29,30,38,43,60,70,170,234,250,281,540,591,629,850,1176,1177,2394
භෝජන/2,13,21,48,591,850,1943,3319
මති/9,112,2503
මල්ල/1,3,4,10,16,42,79,89,179,225,333,375,476,597,624,662,1827,2292,2332,3177,3530,3561
මේවා/1,15,21,57,70,92,243,934,2585,2587
මොර/3,277,853,878,923,1892,2139
යන්න/1,2,3,4,6,7,9,11,12,20,23,31,32,42,49,79,114,115,138,155,224,279,420,459,481,852,1168
යහන්/3832
රැක/3,10,26,42,51,59,63,80,90,102,113,121,125,230,248,270,329,347,358,484,506,560,582,687,704,766,976,977,1112,1608,1732,2504,2626,3537,3538
රූපලාවණ්‍ය/2,19,1110,1177
ලක්/86,172,253,274,298,457,536,564,565,689,814,877,1121,1230,1742,1746,1939,2045,2159,2481,2608,2718,2812,2832
ලලිත/5,20,778,1116
ලෝක/2,3,5,7,13,15,19,21,26,38,43,46,47,49,53,60,70,123,146,200,226,234,295,319,368,449,493,502,873,952,1036,1049,1654,3685,4585
වැලි/277,327,504,645,689,891,1233,1464,2043,2741,4062,4108
විටක/2714
විදේශික/15,27,47,62,74,81,92,97,136,146,164,195,239,322,335,557,1218
විද්‍යාලය/1,2,3,5,6,7,11,15,17,21,27,34,77,114,115,634,1520,3288
වින/2,5,13,16,20,42,108,302,1010,1220,1295,1466,1539,1781,2168,2307,2416,3098,3244,4195,4466,4995
ශිෂ්‍ය/9,27,47,62,73,74,81,92,97,136,141,164,180,182,195,197,200,205,239,255,335,419,455,468,520,627,731,1173,1356,1402,2036,3251,3252,3253,3732
ශ්‍රම/2,13,19,21,48,53,106,128,479,1033,1166,1349,1350,1693,1714,1870,3946
සහභාගි/52,64,76,87,88,131,143,145,177,182,189,197,293,294,379,719,791,980,1252,1253,2517,3971
සිටි/2,6,8,11,15,21,25,27,33,47,50,53,70,74,75,81,82,103,139,144,146,160,165,195,206,222,234,240,245,257,318,392,577,641,680,708,874,885,920,970,1075,1244,1396,1645,1684,1833,2020,2033,2034,2084,2653,2654,2655,2658,3686,3859,3860,3862,3863,4939,4944,4948,4952
සිදුව/3,24,33,42,51,82,83,102,103,121,140,165,175,184,203,207,211,220,230,240,263,270,280,299,310,316,326,341,374,402,476,543,649,679,680,700,766,917,970,1089,1141,1146,1147,1237,1506,1785,1809,1830,2250,2653,3024,3026,3861,4656,4725,4971
සුර/432,862,2811,2974,2975,3027,4096,4330,4350,4787
සොබා/10,39,1251,3959
සොව/18,3386
හැඟ/3,16,42,64,121,211,216,220,230,270,280,287,310,316,326,374,480,545,586,721,913,1330,3142,4836,4866
හැර/2,3,16,42,51,56,59,63,64,69,76,79,80,87,88,102,113,121,126,131,140,142,143,145,179,203,208,211,220,230,263,264,272,273,276,280,286,301,310,316,326,374,402,456,478,580,587,622,623,624,656,923,1017,1019,1022,1152,1498,1522,1529,1852,2233,2282,2306,2786,3080,3828
හිත/1,3,4,5,11,18,20,24,28,31,33,39,56,69,83,86,99,102,103,108,165,170,184,207,220,230,240,241,257,262,263,270,280,380,393,406,463,526,545,587,679,700,705,714,802,974,1015,1200,1273,1313,1416,1503,1569,1738,1739,1827,1964,2395,2402,2486,2529,3009,3307,3387,3507,3563,3565,3567,4640,4774,4782
හේම/20,377,451,578,684,962,1437,1561,2609,4109
